Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Article 3. Firemen’s and Policemen’s Disability and Relief Funds.
§ 21-29-147.
Death benefits where death results from other causes.

[For any municipality that has elected to authorize the continuation of or reinstatement of spouse retirement benefits under the provisions of Section 21-29-329, this section shall read as follows:]

If any member of a fire or police department dies while a member of the fire or police department, and who has had not less than five (5) years’ service with the department, there shall be paid from the firemen’s and policemen’s disability and relief fund benefits as follows:

For each year’s active service, not to exceed a period of twenty (20) years, one-fortieth (1/40) of the average monthly salary or compensation received by the member in the six-month period next preceding his or her death; and

For each full year of active service in excess of twenty (20) years service, an additional payment in a sum equal to one and seven-tenths percent (1-7/10%) of the same average monthly base salary and longevity pay received by the member in the six-month period next preceding his or her death (provided that no such payment shall exceed sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average monthly base salary and longevity pay received by a member for the six-month period next preceding his or her death) to the spouse of the deceased member for life for the use of the spouse and the child or children of the deceased member under the age of eighteen (18) years. If the deceased member is not survived by a spouse, but there remains a child or children of the deceased member still under the age of eighteen (18) years, the payments shall be made to a parent or lawful custodian of the child or children without the necessity of appointment as guardian for the benefit of the child or children, so long as the child or children are under the age of eighteen (18) years. After the death of the spouse, all payments to the spouse shall cease, and after the death or attainment of the age of eighteen (18) years of any child or children of the deceased member, all payments to the child or children over eighteen (18) years of age shall cease. If the deceased member is not survived by spouse or child or children under the age of eighteen (18) years, but is survived by a father, mother or an unmarried sister dependent upon him or her, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent father or mother or both, so long as each lives. If there is no dependent father or mother surviving the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent sister or sisters of the deceased member, or dependent incurable children of the deceased member, so long as the beneficiary or beneficiaries remain unmarried. Upon the death or marriage of any such sisters, all payments shall cease to her. The word “dependent” as used in this section shall mean “wholly dependent.”

It is the intention of the Legislature that the benefits authorized by paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section shall be paid to all qualified and eligible spouses whose deceased spouses died before March 27, 1978.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3487.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 546; Laws, 1978, ch. 435, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 21-29-149.
Suit shall not be filed in cases of insufficient funds.

Should said fund at any time be insufficient to make all payments properly payable therefrom, the beneficiaries shall not file any suit against said city, its governing authorities, or said disability and relief board, but the amounts available shall be properly prorated until such time as funds may be sufficient to make all payments payable thereafter for the full amount properly allowed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3488; Laws, 1940, ch. 287.

§ 21-29-151.
Application.

This article shall apply to municipalities whether under private charter or existing and operating under the general statutes of the State of Mississippi.

This article is supplementary to any laws heretofore passed and the provisions of this article are not applicable to any municipality operating under Article 5 of this chapter. It is the intention of the legislature to make it mandatory on municipalities to enforce the provisions of this article, unless a majority of those voting in an election thereon vote otherwise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3490, 3494; Laws, 1940, ch. 287.